Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
ORGANIZATION

§432:1-201 Incorporation by charter.
Any mutual benefit society may be or become incorporated by charter,
notwithstanding any limitations under the corporation law as to the purposes
for which charters may be granted. Any society so chartered as a corporation
shall be subject in all respects to this article. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am
L 2001, c 217, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next